Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 37.2-800.
Applicability of chapter.

For the purposes of this chapter, whenever the term mental illness appears, it shall include substance abuse. Whenever the term responsible person appears, it shall include a family member as that term is defined in §

37.2-100

, a community services board or behavioral health authority, any treating physician of the person, or a law-enforcement officer. Whenever the term community services board or board appears, it shall include behavioral health authority.

History.

1968, c. 477, § 37.1-63; 1976, c. 671; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 850, 870.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 850 and 870 are identical, and added the last two sentences.

Law Review.

For note, see “Sheltering Psychiatric Patients from the DeShaney Storm: A Proposed Analysis for Determining Affirmative Duties to Voluntary Patients,” 70 Wash & Lee L. Rev. 725 (2013).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 32 Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts; Family Courts; Small Claims Court; Commissioners in Chancery: Local Rules of Court. § 32.02 Proceedings in Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 142; 10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, § 3.

§ 37.2-801.
Admission procedures; forms.

Any person alleged to have a mental illness to a degree that warrants treatment in a facility may be admitted to a facility by compliance with one of the following admission procedures:

Voluntary admission;

Admission of incapacitated persons pursuant to §

37.2-805.1

; or

Involuntary admission by the procedure described in §§

37.2-809

through

37.2-820

.

The Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia shall prepare the petitions, orders, and such other legal forms as may be required in procedures for custody, detention, and involuntary admission pursuant to Articles 4 (§

37.2-808

et seq.) and 5 (§

37.2-814

et seq.) of Chapter 8, and shall distribute such forms to the clerks of the general district courts and juvenile and domestic relations district courts of the Commonwealth. The Department shall prepare the preadmission screening report, examination, and such other clinical forms as may be required in proceedings for custody, detention, and admission pursuant to §

37.2-805

, and Articles 4 (§

37.2-808

et seq.) and 5 (§

37.2-814

et seq.) of Chapter 8, and shall distribute such forms to community services boards, mental health care providers, and directors of state facilities.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-61.1, 37-67, 37-121; 1950, pp. 903, 916; 1958, c. 154; 1964, c. 640; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-64; 1970, c. 673; 1972, c. 639; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716; 2009, cc. 211, 268, 708.

Cross references.

As to jurisdiction of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Courts generally, see § 16.1-241.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 211 and 268 are identical, and deleted “by the procedure described in §

37.2-805

, or” from the end in subdivision A 1; added present subdivision A 2; and redesignated former subdivision A 2 as subdivision A 3.

The 2009 amendment by c. 708, in subsection B, substituted “Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia shall prepare the petitions, orders and such other legal” for “Board shall prescribe and the Department shall prepare the such,” inserted “custody, detention, and involuntary” following “in procedures for,” substituted “pursuant to Article 4 (§

37.2-808

et seq.) and 5 (§

37.2-814

et seq.) of Chapter 8, and shall distribute such forms” for “These forms, which shall be the legal forms used in admissions, shall be approved by the Attorney General and distributed by the Department,” deleted “and to the directors of the state facilities” following “courts of the Commonwealth”; and added the present last sentence.

§ 37.2-802.
Interpreters in admission or certification proceedings.

In any proceeding pursuant to §

37.2-806

or §§

37.2-809

through

37.2-820

in which a person who is deaf is alleged to have intellectual disability or mental illness, an interpreter for the person shall be appointed by the district court judge or special justice before whom the proceeding is pending from a list of qualified interpreters provided by the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing. The interpreter shall be compensated as provided for in §

37.2-804

.

In any proceeding pursuant to §

37.2-806

or §§

37.2-809

through

37.2-820

in which a non-English-speaking person is alleged to have intellectual disability or mental illness or is a witness in such proceeding, an interpreter for the person shall be appointed by the district court judge or special justice, or in the case of §§

37.2-809

through

37.2-813

a magistrate, before whom the proceeding is pending. Failure to appoint an interpreter when an interpreter is not reasonably available or when the person’s level of English fluency cannot be determined shall not be a basis to dismiss the petition or void the order entered at the proceeding. The compensation for the interpreter shall be fixed by the court in accordance with the guidelines set by the Judicial Council of Virginia and shall be paid out of the state treasury.

History.

1976, c. 671, § 37.1-67.5; 1979, c. 204; 2004, c. 243, § 37.1-67.5:01; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in subsection A and in the first sentence of subsection B.

§ 37.2-803.
Special justices to perform duties of judge.

The chief judge of each judicial circuit may appoint one or more special justices, for the purpose of performing the duties required of a judge by this chapter, Chapter 11 (§

37.2-1100

et seq.), and §§ 16.1-69.28, 16.1-335 through 16.1-348,

19.2-169.6

,

19.2-174.1

,

19.2-182.9

,

53.1-40.1

,

53.1-40.2

,

53.1-40.9

, and

53.1-133.04

. Each special justice shall be a person licensed to practice law in the Commonwealth or a retired or substitute judge in good standing and shall have all the powers and jurisdiction conferred upon a judge. The special justice shall serve under the supervision and at the pleasure of the chief judge of the judicial circuit for a period of up to six years. The special justice may be reappointed and may serve additional periods of up to six years, at the pleasure of the chief judge. Within six months of appointment, each special justice appointed on or after January 1, 1996, shall complete a minimum training program prescribed by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court. Special justices shall collect the fees prescribed in this chapter for their service and shall retain those fees, unless the governing body of the county or city in which the services are performed provides for the payment of an annual salary for the services, in which case the fees shall be collected and paid into the treasury of that county or city.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-61.2; 1952, c. 700; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-88; 1974, c. 111; 1976, c. 671; 1995, c. 844; 2005, c. 716; 2007, cc. 500, 897; 2009, c. 608; 2010, cc. 340, 406; 2019, c. 809.

Cross references.

As to definition of “special justices” generally, see §

37.2-100

. As to payment of fees and expenses for special justices, see §

53.1-40.8

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 500 and 897 are identical, and substituted “16.1-335 through 16.1-348” for “16.1-339” in the first sentence, inserted “or a retired or substitute judge in good standing” in the second sentence, inserted “for a period of up to six years” at the end of the third sentence and inserted the fourth sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 608 substituted “of the judicial circuit” for “making the appointment” in the third sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 340 and 406 are identical, and deleted “19.2-177.1” following “19.2-174.1” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 809 inserted “and

53.1-133.04

”; and made stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Availability of special justice when temporary detention order expires. —

For purposes of §

37.2-809

, court is “closed” when the General District Court with jurisdiction is not open, and not based on the availability of a special justice. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Michael W. Taylor, Sheriff, Pittsylvania County, 17-025, 2018 Va. AG LEXIS 8 (7/6/2018).

Representation of individuals in commitment hearings. —

A special justice may represent individuals in commitment hearings under § 37.1-67.3 [see now §

37.2-814

], held in the judicial circuit in which the special justice serves. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William G. Barkley, Judge, Albemarle General District Court, 02-063, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 148 (8/21/02) (decided under prior law).

§ 37.2-804.
Fees and expenses.

Any special justice, retired judge sitting by designation pursuant to § 16.1-69.35, or any district court substitute judge who presides over hearings pursuant to the provisions of §§

37.2-809

through

37.2-820

, Article 16 (§ 16.1-335 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 16.1, or §

19.2-169.6

shall receive a fee of $86.25 for each hearing thereunder plus his necessary mileage, parking, tolls, and postage, and $43.25 for each certification hearing and each order under Chapter 11 (§

37.2-1100

et seq.) ruling on competency or treatment plus his necessary mileage, parking, tolls, and postage.

Any physician, psychologist or other mental health professional, or any interpreter, appointed pursuant to §

37.2-802

for persons who are deaf, who is not regularly employed by the Commonwealth and is required to serve as a witness or as an interpreter in any proceeding under this chapter or §

19.2-169.6

shall receive a fee of $75 and his necessary expenses for each commitment hearing for involuntary admission in which he serves and $43.25 and necessary expenses for each certification hearing in which he serves.

Other witnesses regularly summoned before a judge or special justice under the provisions of this chapter shall receive the compensation for their attendance and mileage that is allowed witnesses summoned to testify before grand juries.

Every attorney appointed under §

37.2-806

or §§

37.2-809

through

37.2-820

shall receive a fee of $75 and his necessary expenses for each hearing thereunder and $43.25 and his necessary expenses for each certification hearing and each proceeding under Chapter 11 (§

37.2-1100

et seq.).

Except as hereinafter provided, all expenses incurred, including the fees, attendance, and mileage aforesaid, shall be paid by the Commonwealth. When any such fees, costs, and expenses, incurred in connection with an examination or hearing for an admission pursuant to §

37.2-806

or §§

37.2-809

through

37.2-820

, to carry out the provisions of this chapter or in connection with a proceeding under Chapter 11 (§

37.2-1100

et seq.) or §

19.2-169.6

, are paid by the Commonwealth, they shall be recoverable by the Commonwealth from the person who is the subject of the examination, hearing, or proceeding or from his estate. Collection or recovery may be undertaken by the Department. When the fees, costs, and expenses are collected or recovered by the Department, they shall be refunded to the Commonwealth. No fees or costs shall be recovered, however, from the person who is the subject of the examination or hearing or his estate when no good cause for his admission exists or when the recovery would create an undue financial hardship.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-75; 1950, pp. 906, 1596; 1954, c. 194; 1956, c. 445; 1958, c. 346; 1962, c. 20; 1964, c. 640; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-89; 1970, c. 673; 1975, c. 197; 1976, cc. 374, 459, 671; 1977, c. 674; 1979, c. 204; 1982, c. 454; 1989, c. 591; 1991, c. 86; 1995, c. 844; 1996, c. 893; 1997, c. 921; 1998, c. 455; 2005, c. 716; 2007, cc. 500, 897; 2009, c. 266; 2010, cc. 340, 406.

Cross references.

As to fees and expenses for hearing on medical or mental health treatment of prisoners incapable of giving consent, see §

53.1-133.04

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 266, cl. 2 provides: “That any costs associated with complying with the provisions of this act shall be absorbed within the funds appropriated by the General Assembly for Involuntary Mental Commitments within the Judicial Department.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 500 and 897 are nearly identical and, in subsection A, inserted “retired judge sitting by designation pursuant to § 16.1-69.35” following “justice” and “or Article 16 (§ 16.1-335 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 16.1” following “37.2-820”; and substituted “hearing thereunder” for “commitment hearing for involuntary admission” in subsections A and D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 266, in subsection A, substituted “plus his necessary mileage, parking, tolls, and postage” for “and his necessary mileage” twice.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 340 and 406 are identical, and inserted “§

19.2-169.6

” and made minor stylistic changes in subsection A, subsection B, and subsection E.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2020 Involuntary Admission Hearing Invoice.

§ 37.2-804.1.
Use of electronic communication.

Petitions and orders for emergency custody and temporary detention pursuant to this chapter may be filed, issued, served, or executed by electronic means, with or without the use of two-way electronic video and audio communication, and returned in the same manner with the same force, effect, and authority as an original document. All signatures thereon shall be treated as original signatures.

Any judge or special justice may conduct proceedings pursuant to this chapter using any two-way electronic video and audio communication system to provide for the appearance of any parties and witnesses. Any two-way electronic video and audio communication system used to conduct a proceeding shall meet the standards set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

. When a witness whose testimony would be helpful to the conduct of the proceeding is not able to be physically present, his testimony may be received using a telephonic communication system.

History.

2005, cc. 51, 716.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 51 enacted former § 37.1-67.7, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5 and § 30-152, Acts 2005, c. 51 has been given effect in this section as set out above.
See also §§

37.2-913

and

37.2-1109

.

§ 37.2-804.2.
Disclosure of records.

Any health care provider, as defined in §

32.1-127.1:03

, or other provider who has provided or is currently providing services to a person who is the subject of proceedings pursuant to this chapter shall, upon request, disclose to a magistrate, the court, the person’s attorney, the person’s guardian ad litem, the examiner identified to perform an examination pursuant to §

37.2-815

, the community services board or its designee performing any evaluation, preadmission screening, or monitoring duties pursuant to this chapter, or a law-enforcement officer any information that is necessary and appropriate for the performance of his duties pursuant to this chapter. Any health care provider, as defined in §

32.1-127.1:03

, or other provider who has provided or is currently evaluating or providing services to a person who is the subject of proceedings pursuant to this chapter shall disclose information that may be necessary for the treatment of such person to any other health care provider or other provider evaluating or providing services to or monitoring the treatment of the person. Health records disclosed to a law-enforcement officer shall be limited to information necessary to protect the officer, the person, or the public from physical injury or to address the health care needs of the person. Information disclosed to a law-enforcement officer shall not be used for any other purpose, disclosed to others, or retained.

Any health care provider providing services to a person who is the subject of proceedings under this chapter shall (i) inform the person that his family member or personal representative, including any agent named in an advance directive executed in accordance with the Health Care Decisions Act (§

54.1-2981

et seq.), will be notified of information that is directly relevant to such individual’s involvement with the person’s health care, which may include the person’s location and general condition, in accordance with subdivision D 34 of §

32.1-127.1:03

, and (ii) make a reasonable effort to so notify the person’s family member or personal representative, unless the provider has actual knowledge that the family member or personal representative is currently prohibited by court order from contacting the person. No health care provider shall be required to notify a person’s family member or personal representative pursuant to this section if the health care provider has actual knowledge that such notice has been provided.

Any health care provider disclosing records pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liability for any harm resulting from the disclosure, including any liability under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.), as amended, unless the person or provider disclosing such records intended the harm or acted in bad faith.

History.

2008, cc. 782, 850, 870; 2009, cc. 606, 651; 2016, cc. 569, 693.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 606 and 651 are nearly identical and added the next-to-last paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 569 and 693 are identical, and in the second paragraph, substituted “shall (i) inform the person that his” for “may notify the person’s,” inserted “including any agent named in an advance directive executed in accordance with the Health Care Decisions Act (§

54.1-2981

et seq.), will be notified,” “and (ii) make a reasonable effort to so notify the person’s family member or personal representative,” and added the last sentence.